Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3167
Reverse Osmosis System Tax Credit Act, how cited.

Sections 77-3167 to 77-3170 shall be known and may be cited as the Reverse Osmosis System Tax Credit Act.

Laws 2024, LB937, § 60.